tables/ru-ru-g1.ctb
endword ам 134
endword амся 134-234
endword стамся 25-1-134-234
endword лам 123-134
endword рам 1235-134
endword ям 134
endword ямся 134-234
endword ым 134
endword ымся 134-234
endword им 134
endword имся 134-234
endword ами 124
endword лами 123-124
endword рами 1235-124
endword амись 124-234
endword ями 124
endword ямись 124-234
endword ими 124
endword имись 124-234
endword имися 124-234
endword ыми 124
endword ымись 124-234
endword ымися 124-234
endword ат 6
endword атся 6-234
endword статся 25-1-6-234
endword ят 6
endword ятся 6-234
endword ах 125
endword ахся 125-234
endword ях 125
endword яхся 125-234
endword их 125
endword ихся 125-234
endword ых 125
endword ыхся 125-234
midword ающ 36-1346
midword лающ 123-36-1346
midword рающ 1235-36-1346
midword яющ 36-1346
endword ая 1356
endword лая 123-1356
endword рая 1235-1356
endword аясь 1356-234
endword лаясь 123-1356-234
endword раясь 1235-1356-234
endword яя 1356
endword яясь 1356-234
endword ев 2456
endword ов 2456
midendword ева 3456
midendword ова 3456
midendword ива 3456
midendword ыва 3456
endword его 12456
endword ого 12456
endword ее 156
endword ееся 156-234
endword её 156
endword ое 156
endword ей 13456
endword ейся 13456-234
endword ёй 13456
endword ёйся 13456-234
endword ой 13456
endword ойся 13456-234
endword ойсь 13456-234
endword ем 235
endword емся 235-234
endword ём 235
endword ёмся 235-234
endword стаёмся 25-1-235-234
endword аем 235
endword аём 235
endword лаем 123-235
endword раем 1235-235
endword аемся 235-234
endword аёмся 235-234
endword лаемся 123-235-234
endword раемся 1235-235-234
endword стаемся 25-1-235-234
endword стаёмся 25-1-235-234
endword яем 235
endword яемся 235-234
endword оем 235
endword оемся 235-234
endword ему 146
endword емуся 146-234
endword ому 146
midword ени 34
midword дени 145-34
midword рени 1235-34
endword ет 14
endword ется 14-234
endword ёт 14
endword ётся 14-234
word вает 2456-1-14
endword ешь 36-156
endword ешься 36-156-234
endword ёшь 36-156
endword ёшься 36-156-234
midword жайш 6-245
midword ижайш 6-245
endword ие 14
endword иеся 14-234
endword ые 14
midword изаци 6-14
midword лизаци 123-6-14
midword мизаци 134-6-14
midword низаци 1345-6-14
midword ризаци 1235-6-14
midword тизаци 2345-6-14
midendword изм 134
midendword лизм 123-134
midendword мизм 134-134
midendword низм 1345-134
midendword ризм 1235-134
midendword тизм 2345-134
endword ий 12346
endword ийся 12346-234
endword ый 12346
endword ыйся 12346-234
endword им 134
endword имся 134-234
midword ирова 6-3456
midword лирова 123-6-3456
midword мирова 134-6-3456
midword нирова 1345-6-3456
midword рирова 1235-6-3456
midword тирова 2345-6-3456
midword ированн 6-3456-1345
midword лированн 123-6-3456-1345
midword мированн 134-6-3456-1345
midword нированн 1345-6-3456-1345
midword рированн 1235-6-3456-1345
midword тированн 2345-6-3456-1345
endword ирован 6-3456-1345
endword лирован 123-6-3456-1345
endword мирован 134-6-3456-1345
endword нирован 1345-6-3456-1345
endword рирован 1235-6-3456-1345
endword тирован 2345-6-3456-1345
midendword ист 2345
midendword лист 123-2345
midendword мист 134-2345
midendword нист 1345-2345
midendword рист 1235-2345
midendword тист 2345-2345
midword истическ 6-13
midword листическ 123-6-13
midword мистическ 134-6-13
midword нистическ 1345-6-13
midword ристическ 1235-6-13
midword тистическ 2345-6-13
midword ическ 6-13
midword лическ 123-6-13
midword мическ 134-6-13
midword ническ 1345-6-13
midword рическ 1235-6-13
midword тическ 2345-6-13
midword ческ 6-13
endword ит 45
endword ится 45-234
midendword ител 2356
midendword лител 123-2356
midendword мител 134-2356
midendword нител 1345-2356
midendword рител 1235-2356
midendword тител 2345-2356
midendword итель 2356
midendword литель 123-2356
midendword митель 134-2356
midendword нитель 1345-2356
midendword ритель 1235-2356
midendword титель 2345-2356
midendword ительн 2356
midendword лительн 123-2356
midendword мительн 134-2356
midendword нительн 1345-2356
midendword рительн 1235-2356
midendword тительн 2345-2356
midendword ренительн 1235-15-34-2356
midword ительност 2356-25
midword лительност 123-2356-25
midword мительност 134-2356-25
midword нительност 1345-2356-25
midword рительност 1235-2356-25
midword тительност 2345-2356-25
midword ренительност 1235-15-34-2356-25
midendword ительств 2356-2456
midendword лительств 123-2356-2456
midendword мительств 134-2356-2456
midendword нительств 1345-2356-2456
midendword рительств 1235-2356-2456
midendword тительств 2345-2356-2456
midendword ренительств 1235-15-34-2356-2456
midword ительственн 2356-2456-1345
midword лительственн 123-2356-2456-1345
midword мительственн 134-2356-2456-1345
midword нительственн 1345-2356-2456-1345
midword рительственн 1235-2356-2456-1345
midword тительственн 2345-2356-2456-1345
midword ренительственн 1235-15-34-2356-2456-1345
endword ишь 6-156
endword ишься 6-156-234
midword ост 25
midword ност 25
midword ственн 25-1345
endword ствен 25-1345
midword ственност 25-25
endword сь 234
endword ся 234
endword ться 23456-234
endword ть 23456
endword ут 46
endword утся 46-234
endword ют 46
endword ются 46-234
endword ую 12356
endword уюсь 12356-234
endword уюся 12356-234
endword юю 12356
endword ююсь 12356-234
endword ююся 12356-234
midword ующ 6-1346
midword юющ 6-1346
midword чайш 6-12345
midword ичайш 6-12345
prfword стал 25-1-123
endword стался 25-1-123-234
prfword стала 25-1-4
endword сталась 25-1-4-234
prfword стало 25-1-456
endword стало 25-1-456-234
prfword стали 25-1-35
endword стались 25-1-35-234

# Table IV

word вас 3456
word вами 2456-124
word весь 23456
word ь 6-23456
word Ь 6-23456
always все 156
always всё 156
word ш 6-156
word Ш 6-156
word всю 156-1256
word вся 156-1246
word всяк 2456-13
begmidword всяк 2456-13
word вк 6-2456-13
word его 12456
word ее 26
word её 26
word ей 25
word ему 146
word ими 124
word ф 6-124
word Ф 6-124
word их 125
word х 6-125
word Х 6-125
begword кажд 13-145
begword как 346
begmidword котор 13
word мы 134
word м 6-134
word М 6-134
word несколько 16-234-1456
word нисколько 34-234-1456
word он 1345
word н 6-1345
word Н 6-1345
sufword сам 14
sufword ц 6-14
sufword Ц 6-14
begword себ 234
word сколько 234-1456
word столько 25-1456
word ты 236
sufword это 246
word э 6-246
word Э 6-246
begword эт 246

# Table V

word будто 12-13456
word впрочем 2456-134
word если 15
word е 6-15
word Е 6-15
word ибо 24-23
word как 346
word однако 135-1456
word потому\sчто 1234-3-12345
word также 123456-245
word так\sкак 2345-3-13
word тоже 13456-245
word что 12345
word ч 6-12345
word Ч 6-12345
word чтоб 12345-12
word чтобы 12345-23

# Table VI

prfword бы 23
word всё-таки 156-36-246
word все-таки 156-36-246
word даже 145-245
word дж 6-145-245
word именно 24-126
word ли 35
match (%a)+(%~)* либо ^|!%a 35
word лишь 123
word л 6-123
word Л 6-123
word ль 2356
word неужели 16-35
match (%a)+(%~)* нибудь ^|!%a 34
word разве 1235-23456
word спасибо 234-12
word сб 6-234-12
word только 2356
word уже 245
word ж 6-245
word Ж 6-245

# Table VII (A)

begmidword буд 12
begword будущ 12-1346
always был 12
word б 6-12
word Б 6-12
begmidword бывш 12
word быть 12-23456
always мог 134
begmidword мож 134
begword могущ 134-1346
word может\sбыть 134-3-12
begmidword хоч 125
begmidword хоте 125
begmidword хоти 125
begmidword хотя 125
word хоть 125-23456
prfword хотя 125-1246
word нехотя 16-125-1246
word предъявить 1234-3-1246-23456
always явить 1246-23456
partword яв 1246
partword яви 1246
begmidword явлени 1246-34
always явит 1246-2345
always явят 1246-2345
word является 1246-234
word являются 1246-234

# Table VII (B)

word везде 2456-1356
word вместе 2456-146
word вновь 2456-23456
word вообще 1236-1346
word впоследствии 2456-235-24
word всегда 2456-1245
word вг 6-2456-1245
word всюду 2456-145
word вд 6-2456-145
word где 1245
word негде 16-1245
word нигде 34-1245
word г 6-1245
word Г 6-1245
word еще 1346
word ещё 1346
word щ 6-1346
word Щ 6-1346
word здесь 1356
word з 6-1356
word З 6-1356
word иногда 24-1
word иа 6-24-1
word когда 1456-1245
word некогда 16-1456-1245
word никогда 34-1456-1245
word куда 13-145
word некуда 16-13-145
word никуда 34-13-145
word однажды 135-2346
word опять 135-23456
word откуда 1256-13
word неоткуда 16-1256-13
word ниоткуда 34-1256-13
word отсюда 1256-234
word оттуда 1256-2345
word очень 135-236
word потому 1234
word п 6-1234
word П 6-1234
word почему 1234-236
word поэтому 235-246
word разумеется 1235-234
word сегодня 234-1245
word сейчас 234-234
word сс 6-234-234
word сразу 234-136
word су 6-234-136
word сюда 234-145
word сд 6-234-145
word теперь 2345
word т 6-2345
word Т 6-2345
word тогда 13456-1245

# Table VII (C)

word более 26-15
word наиболее 345-26-15
word больше 12-156
begword больш 12-156
word быстро 12-12356
word вначале 2456-345-26
word вскоре 2456-1456
word вскорости 2456-1456-25-24
word главным\sобразом 1245-3-135
word далеко 145-1456
word далее 145-26
word лучше 123-156
begword лучш 123-156
word менее 146-15
word меньше 146-156
begword меньш 146-156
word наверно 345-126
word наверное 345-126-15
word наверняка 345-346
word наконец 1345-14
word наоборот 345-135-2345
word например 345-1234
word раньше 1235-156
word слишком 234-35-134
word так\sдалее 2345-3-145
word так\sназываемый 2345-3-1345
word таким\sобразом 2345-3-135
word тому\sподобное 2345-3-1234

# Table VII (D)

word абсолютно 1-12-2345-126
word активно 1-2456-126
word актуально 1-13-2356-126
word вероятно 23456-12356-126
word возможно 1236-1356-134-126
word невозможно 16-1236-1356-134-126
word давно 145-126
word недавно 16-145-126
word достаточно 256-25-126
word недостаточно 16-256-25-126
word ежегодно 15-12456-126
word ежедневно 15-145-126
word ежемесячно 15-146-126
word конечно 1456-126
word можно 134-126
word особенно 135-2346-126
word очевидно 135-236-126
word посредственно 235-234-126
word непосредственно 16-235-234-126
word принципиально 12346-1234-2356-126
word беспринципно 12-12346-1234-126
word своевременно 234-1236-3-126
word следовательно 234-26-126
word случайно 234-12346-126
word совершенно 2346-23456-126
word совсем 2346-156-134
word типично 56-1234-126
word формально 124-134-2356-126
word частично 12345-126
word чрезвычайно 12345-1356-126
word характерно 125-1235-126

#Table VIII
